North Carolina, session 2025, HB856.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 22B-20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 22B-20. Deed restrictions and other agreements prohibiting solar collectors.
(a) The intent of the General Assembly is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare
by encouraging the development and use of solar resources and by prohibiting deed restrictions,
covenants, and other similar agreements that could have the ultimate effect of driving the costs
of owning and maintaining a residence beyond the financial means of most owners.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, any Any deed restriction,
covenant, or similar binding agreement that runs with the land that would prohibit, or have the
effect of prohibiting, the installation of a solar collector that gathers solar radiation as a substitute
for traditional energy for water heating, active space heating and cooling, passive heating, or
generating electricity for a residential property on land subject to the deed restriction, covenant,
or agreement is void and unenforceable. As used in this section, the term "residential property"
means property where the predominant use is for residential purposes. The term "residential
property" does not include any condominium created under Chapter 47A or 47C of the General
Statutes located in a multi-story building containing units having horizontal boundaries described
in the declaration. As used in this section, the term "declaration" has the same meaning as in
G.S. 47A-3 or G.S. 47C-1-103, depending on the chapter of the General Statutes under which
the condominium was created.
(c) This section does not prohibit a deed restriction, covenant, or similar binding
agreement that runs with the land that would regulate the location or screening of solar collectors
as described in subsection (b) of this section, provided the deed restriction, covenant, or similar
binding agreement does not have the effect of preventing the reasonable use reducing the
operating efficiency of a solar collector for a residential property. If an owners' association is
responsible for exterior maintenance of a structure containing individual residences, a deed
restriction, covenant, or similar binding agreement that runs with the land may provide that (i)
the title owner of the residence shall be responsible for all damages caused by the installation,
existence, or removal of solar collectors; (ii) the title owner of the residence shall hold harmless
and indemnify the owners' association for any damages caused by the installation, existence, or
removal of solar collectors; and (iii) the owners' association shall not be responsible for
maintenance, repair, replacement, or removal of solar collectors unless expressly agreed in a
written agreement that is recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties
*H856-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in which the property is situated. As used in this section, "owners' association" has the same
meaning as in G.S. 47F-1-103. As used in this section, the term "reducing the operating efficiency
of a solar collector" means the regulation of the location or screening of the solar collector would
decrease the efficiency or performance of the solar collector by more than ten percent (10%) of
the amount that was originally specified for the solar collector.
(d) This section does not prohibit a deed restriction, covenant, or similar binding
agreement that runs with the land that would prohibit the location of solar collectors as described
in subsection (b) of this section that are visible by a person on the ground:
(1) On the facade of a structure that faces areas open to common or public access;
(2) On a roof surface that slopes downward toward the same areas open to
common or public access that the façade of the structure faces; or
(3) Within the area set off by a line running across the façade of the structure
extending to the property boundaries on either side of the façade, and those
areas of common or public access faced by the structure.
(e) In any civil action arising under this section, the court may award costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees to the prevailing party."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to deed
restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements that run with the land recorded on or after
that date.
Page 2 House Bill 856-First Edition